Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2267.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1414.13. Possession and Use of Prescribed Pancreatic Enzyme Rep lacement Therapy .-- (a) A school entity shall require the parent or guardian of a secondary school student who has pancreatic insufficiency or cystic fibrosis, who has been prescribed PERT and who requests that the student possess and self-administer PERT in a school setting to provide all of the following:(1) A signed and written order from the student's health 1234567891011121314151617181920 care practitioner that:(i) states the name and dose of PERT , the times when PERT is to be taken, the period for which use is authorized and the diagnosis or reason PERT is needed; and (ii) identifies any potential serious reaction to PERT , describes the appropriate emergency response and states whether the student is competent to self-administer PERT and able to follow proper safety precautions for handling and disposing of PERT . (2) A written request from the parent or guardian that the school entity comply with the instructions of the student's health care practitioner. The request shall include a statement that relieves the school entity and each school employe from responsibility for the prescribed PERT and acknowledges that the school entity does not bear responsibility for ensuring that the student takes PERT . (3) A written acknowledgment by the school nurse that the student has demonstrated that the student is capable of self-administration of PERT . (4) A written acknowledgment by the student that the student has received instruction from the student's health care practitioner on proper safety precautions for handling and disposing of PERT , will not allow other students to have access to PERT and understands appropriate safeguards. (b) A school entity may revoke or restrict a student's privilege to possess and self-administer PERT if the student fails to comply with school rules and the provisions of the student's service agreement or individualized education program or demonstrates an unwillingness or inability to safeguard PERT from access by other students.20260HB2267PN2966 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) If a school entity prohibits a student from possessing and self-administering PERT under subsection (b), the school entity shall ensure that PERT is stored in a readily accessible place in the school building attended by the student. The school entity shall notify the school nurse and other identified school employes of the location of PERT and the means of access. (d) A school entity shall adopt a written policy that allows possession and self-administration of PERT by students described under subsection (e) in a school setting. The policy shall, at a minimum:(1) state the process for submission of the documentation required under subsection (a);(2) identify the locations in each school building where PERT may be stored for students who are not permitted to self- carry;(3) limit the quantity of PERT that a student may bring to school to a daily supply; and(4) require that PERT beyond the daily supply be stored in the school nurse's office or in another location designated in the policy that is consistent with the school health program.(e) This section shall apply only to students with cystic fibrosis or pancreatic insufficiency who require PERT that has been prescribed by a health care practitioner.(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the development or implementation of a service agreement or individualized education program that addresses the possession and self-administration of PERT by a student. (g) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:20260HB2267PN2966 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Pancreatic enzyme replacement therapy" or "PERT" shall mean a prescribed pancreatic enzyme replacement therapy supplement that is used to treat malabsorption syndrome due to pancreatic problems associated with cystic fibrosis."Pancreatic insufficiency" shall mean a disorder of the digestive system that may include a diagnosis of cystic fibrosis, a chronic disease that affects the lungs and digestive system."School entity" shall mean a school district, intermediate unit, area career and technical school, charter school, cyber charter school or regional charter school.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2267PN2966 - 4 - 123456789101112